New York, session 2025-2026, A6857.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 207 of the public health law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (t) to read as follows: 3 (t) The diagnosis, treatment and prevention of HTLV-1 and HTLV-2, 4 including information and assistance on where to find community support 5 services, support groups, respite, and care management. In instances in 6 which viral typing is possible, educational materials shall direct to 7 virus specific community support services, support groups, respite, and 8 care management as HTLV-1 and HTLV-2 are two different retroviruses with 9 differing epidemiologies and disease associations requiring specific 10 recommendations for persons infected with HTLV-1 or HTLV-2. Such materi- 11 als shall be made available to clinics that specialize in sexually tran- 12 smitted diseases, health care facilities, and department of corrections 13 and community supervision facilities. All information and materials 14 shall be maintained and updated to reflect best practice recommendations 15 and shall be culturally and linguistically appropriate for the communi- 16 ties the materials are made available to. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 18 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 19 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 20 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 21 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08956-01-5